Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,257
Environmental audit; use as evidence; waiver.

Except as provided in section 25-21,259, the person for whom the environmental audit was prepared, whether the audit was prepared by the person, by an employee of the person, or by a consultant hired by the person, may waive the protection provided in section 25-21,256 only by an express waiver.

Laws 1998, LB 395, § 4.